Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 4

Mandatory Child Abuse Reports

37-1-401. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Child” means a person who is under eighteen (18) years of age or who is reasonably presumed to be under eighteen (18) years of age;

“Department” means the department of children's services; and

“Report of harm” means a report filed under § 37-1-403.

Acts 1973, ch. 81, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1; T.C.A., § 37-1201; Acts 1987, ch. 145, § 25; 1988, ch. 964, § 4; 1996, ch. 1079, § 73.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of marital and family therapist communications with client, §63-22-114.

Family violence shelters and child abuse prevention services and reports, title 71, ch. 6, part 2.

Report of child sexual abuse, title 37, ch. 1, part 6.

Rule Reference. Sections 37-1-401 — 37-1-411 are referred to in Rule 13 of the Rules of the Supreme Court of Tennessee.

This part is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 501 of the Tennessee Rules of Evidence.

Textbooks. Tennessee Law of Evidence (2nd ed., Cohen, Paine and Sheppeard), Rule 501.

Law Reviews.

Better Protection for the Defenseless — Tennessee's Revised Mandatory Child Abuse Reporting Statute, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 585 (1973).

Chilling Child Abuse Reporting: Rethinking the CAPTA Amendments, 51 Vand. L. Rev. 183 (1998).

Differential Response in Child Protection Services: Perpetuating the Illusion of Voluntariness (Soledad A. McGrath), 42 U. Mem. L. Rev. 629 (2012).

37-1-402. Purpose and construction of part.

The purpose of this part is to protect children whose physical or mental health and welfare are adversely affected by brutality, abuse or neglect by requiring reporting of suspected cases by any person having cause to believe that such case exists. It is intended that, as a result of such reports, the protective services of the state shall be brought to bear on the situation to prevent further abuses, to safeguard and enhance the welfare of children, and to preserve family life. This part shall be administered and interpreted to provide the greatest possible protection as promptly as possible for children.

Except as expressly herein provided, this part shall not be construed as repealing any provision of any other statute but shall be supplementary thereto and cumulative thereof.

Acts 1973, ch. 81, § 1; 1974, ch. 538, § 2; 1977, ch. 343, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 37-1202, 37-1212, 37-1213.

Cross-References. Child sexual abuse, title 37, ch. 1, part 6.

Rule Reference. Sections 37-1-401 — 37-1-411 are referred to in Rule 13 of the Rules of the Supreme Court of Tennessee.

Attorney General Opinions. Juvenile court official's providing copies of civil petitions alleging child abuse to district attorneys general. OAG 10-124, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 130 (12/30/10).

Collateral References.

Physical abuse of child by parent as ground for termination of parent's right to child. 53 A.L.R.3d 848.

Sexual abuse of child by parent as ground for termination of parent's right to child. 58 A.L.R.3d 1074.

37-1-403. Reporting of brutality, abuse, neglect or child sexual abuse — Notification to parents of abuse on school grounds or under school supervision — Confidentiality of records.

Any person who has knowledge of or is called upon to render aid to any child who is suffering from or has sustained any wound, injury, disability, or physical or mental condition shall report such harm immediately if the harm is of such a nature as to reasonably indicate that it has been caused by brutality, abuse or neglect or that, on the basis of available information, reasonably appears to have been caused by brutality, abuse or neglect.

Any such person with knowledge of the type of harm described in this subsection (a) shall report it, by telephone or otherwise, to the:

Judge having juvenile jurisdiction over the child;

Department, in a manner specified by the department, either by contacting a local representative of the department or by utilizing the department's centralized intake procedure, where applicable;

Sheriff of the county where the child resides; or

Chief law enforcement official of the municipality where the child resides.

If any such person knows or has reasonable cause to suspect that a child has been sexually abused, the person shall report such information in accordance with § 37-1-605, relative to the sexual abuse of children, regardless of whether such person knows or believes that the child has sustained any apparent injury as a result of such abuse.

The report shall include, to the extent known by the reporter, the name, address, telephone number and age of the child, the name, address, and telephone number of the person responsible for the care of the child, and the facts requiring the report. The report may include any other pertinent information.

If a law enforcement official or judge becomes aware of known or suspected child abuse, through personal knowledge, receipt of a report, or otherwise, such information shall be reported to the department immediately upon the receipt of such information, and, where appropriate, the child protective team shall be notified to investigate the report for the protection of the child in accordance with this part. Further criminal investigation by such official shall be appropriately conducted in coordination with the team or department to the maximum extent possible.

A law enforcement official or judge who knows or becomes aware of a person who is convicted of a violation of § 55-10-401 and sentenced under § 55-10-402(b), because such person was at the time of the offense accompanied by a child under eighteen (18) years of age, shall report such information, as provided in subdivision (c)(1), and the department shall consider such information to be appropriate for investigation in the same manner as other reports of suspected child abuse or neglect.

If the department receives information containing references to alleged human trafficking or child pornography which does or does not result in an investigation by the department, the department shall notify the appropriate law enforcement agency immediately upon receipt of such information.

If the department initiates an investigation of severe child abuse, including, but not limited to, child sexual abuse, the department shall notify the appropriate local law enforcement agency immediately upon assignment of such case to a department child protective services worker.

Both the department and law enforcement shall maintain a log of all such reports of such information received and confirmation that the information was sent to the appropriate party, pursuant to this subdivision (c)(3).

Any person required to report or investigate cases of suspected child abuse who has reasonable cause to suspect that a child died as a result of child abuse shall report such suspicion to the appropriate medical examiner. The medical examiner shall accept the report for investigation and shall report the medical examiner's findings, in writing, to the local law enforcement agency, the appropriate district attorney general, and the department. Autopsy reports maintained by the medical examiner shall not be subject to the confidentiality requirements provided for in § 37-1-409.

Reports involving known or suspected institutional child sexual abuse shall be made and received in the same manner as all other reports made pursuant to chapter 478 of the Public Acts of 1985, relative to the sexual abuse of children. Investigations of institutional child sexual abuse shall be conducted in accordance with § 37-1-606.

Every physician or other person who makes a diagnosis of, or treats, or prescribes for any sexually transmitted disease set out in § 68-10-112, or venereal herpes and chlamydia, in children thirteen (13) years of age or younger, and every superintendent or manager of a clinic, dispensary or charitable or penal institution, in which there is a case of any of the diseases, as set out in this subsection (f), in children thirteen (13) years of age or younger shall report the case immediately, in writing on a form supplied by the department of health to that department. If the reported cases are confirmed and if sexual abuse is suspected, the department of health will report the case to the department of children's services. The department of children's services will be responsible for any necessary follow-up.

Every physician or other person who makes an initial diagnosis of pregnancy to an unemancipated minor, and every superintendent or manager of a clinic, dispensary or charitable or penal institution in which there is a case of an unemancipated minor who is determined to be pregnant, shall provide to the minor's parent, if the parent is present, and the minor consents, any readily available written information on how to report to the department of children's services an occurrence of sex abuse that may have resulted in the minor's pregnancy, unless disclosure to the parent would violate the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA), 42 U.S.C. § 1320d et seq., or the regulations promulgated pursuant to the act.

Failure to provide the written information shall not subject a person to the penalty provided by § 37-1-412.

The department of children's services shall provide to the department of health the relevant written information. The department of health shall distribute copies of the written information to all licensees of the appropriate health-related boards through the boards' routinely issued newsletters. At the time of initial licensure, these boards shall also provide new licensees a copy of the relevant written information for distribution pursuant to this subsection (g).

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit any hospital, clinic, school, or other organization responsible for the care of children, from developing a specific procedure for internally tracking, reporting, or otherwise monitoring a report made by a member of the organization's staff pursuant to this section, including requiring a member of the organization's staff who makes a report to provide a copy of or notice concerning the report to the organization, so long as the procedure does not inhibit, interfere with, or otherwise affect the duty of a person to make a report as required by subsection (a). Nothing in this section shall prevent staff of a hospital or clinic from gathering sufficient information, as determined by the hospital or clinic, in order to make an appropriate medical diagnosis or to provide and document care that is medically indicated, and is needed to determine whether to report an incident as defined in this part. Those activities shall not interfere with nor serve as a substitute for any investigation by law enforcement officials or the department; provided, that, if any hospital, clinic, school or other organization responsible for the care of children develops a procedure for internally tracking, reporting or otherwise monitoring a report pursuant to this section, the identity of the person who made a report of harm pursuant to this section or § 37-1-605 shall be kept confidential.

Any school official, personnel, employee or member of the board of education who is aware of a report or investigation of employee misconduct on the part of any employee of the school system that in any way involves known or alleged child abuse, including, but not limited to, child physical or sexual abuse or neglect, shall immediately upon knowledge of such information notify the department of children's services or anyone listed in subdivision (a)(2) of the abuse or alleged abuse.

Notwithstanding § 37-5-107 or § 37-1-612, if a school teacher, school official, or other school personnel has knowledge or reasonable cause to suspect that a child who attends the school may be a victim of child abuse or child sexual abuse sufficient to require reporting pursuant to this section, then the school teacher, school official, or other school personnel must follow the procedures outlined in § 49-6-1601.

For purposes of this subsection (i), “school” means any public or privately operated child care agency, as defined in § 71-3-501; child care program, as defined in § 49-1-1102; preschool; nursery school; kindergarten; elementary school; or secondary school.

Acts 1973, ch. 81, § 1; 1977, ch. 343, § 1; 1978, ch. 886, § 2; T.C.A., § 37-1203; Acts 1985, ch. 478, §§ 26, 32, 40; 1987, ch. 145, § 10; 1994, ch. 901, § 2; 1996, ch. 1079, § 73; 2001, ch. 351, § 1; 2005, ch. 185, §§ 1, 2, 3; 2005, ch. 437, § 2; 2006, ch. 843, § 1; 2007, ch. 305, § 1; 2008, ch. 1011, § 1; 2009, ch. 283, §§ 2, 3; 2009, ch. 358, § 2; 2010, ch. 979, §§ 1-4; 2013, ch. 154, § 31; 2020, ch. 708, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For codification of Acts 1985, ch. 478, see Session Law Disposition Tables in Volume 13.

Acts 2008, ch. 1011, § 4 provided that the state board of education, acting in consultation with the department of children's services, is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act, which added subsection (i). The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment rewrote (i)(2) which read: “Notwithstanding §37-5-107 or §37-1-612 or any other law to the contrary, if a school teacher, school official or any other school personnel has knowledge or reasonable cause to suspect that a child who attends such school may be a victim of child abuse or child sexual abuse sufficient to require reporting pursuant to this section and that the abuse occurred on school grounds or while the child was under the supervision or care of the school, then the principal or other person designated by the school shall verbally notify the parent or legal guardian of the child that a report pursuant to this section has been made and shall provide other information relevant to the future wellbeing of the child while under the supervision or care of the school. The verbal notice shall be made in coordination with the department of children's services to the parent or legal guardian within twenty-four (24) hours from the time the school, school teacher, school official or other school personnel reports the abuse to the department of children's services, judge or law enforcement; provided, that in no event may the notice be later than twenty-four (24) hours from the time the report was made. The notice shall not be given to any parent or legal guardian if there is reasonable cause to believe that the parent or legal guardian may be the perpetrator or in any way responsible for the child abuse or child sexual abuse.”; deleted former (i)(3) which read: “Once notice is given pursuant to subdivision (i)(2), the principal or other designated person shall provide to the parent or legal guardian all school information and records relevant to the alleged abuse or sexual abuse, if requested by the parent or legal guardian; provided, that the information is edited to protect the confidentiality of the identity of the person who made the report, any other person whose life or safety may be endangered by the disclosure and any information made confidential pursuant to federal law or §10-7-504(a)(4). The information and records described in this subdivision (i)(3) shall not include records of other agencies or departments.”; and redesignated former (i)(4) as present (i)(3) and inserted “; child care program, as defined in §49-1-1102;”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 708, § 4. August 1, 2020.

Cross-References. Child abuse or child sexual abuse on school grounds, title 49, ch. 6, part 16.

Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Departmental availability for receiving reports, §37-1-606.

Duty to report known or suspected child sexual abuse, §37-1-605.

False reporting of child sexual abuse, §37-1-413.

Rule Reference. Sections 37-1-401 — 37-1-411 are referred to in Rule 13 of the Rules of the Supreme Court of Tennessee.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 28.119.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee's Adoption of the Planning-Operational Test for Determining Discretionary Function Immunity Under the Governmental Tort Liability Act, 60 Tenn. L. Rev. 633 (1993).

Attorney General Opinions. Juvenile court official's providing copies of civil petitions alleging child abuse to district attorneys general. OAG 10-124, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 130 (12/30/10).

37-1-404. Retention of custody of child by hospital or physician — Protective custody.

Any person in charge of a hospital or similar institution or any physician treating a child may keep that child in custody until the next regular weekday session of the juvenile court without the consent of the parents, legal guardian or legal custodian, whether or not additional medical treatment is required, if the circumstances are such, or if the condition of the child is such, that continuing the child in the child's place of residence or in the care or custody of the parents, legal guardian, or legal custodian presents an imminent danger to the child's life or physical or mental health.

Any person taking a child into protective custody shall immediately notify the department, whereupon the department shall immediately begin a child protective investigation in accordance with the provisions of § 37-1-606, and shall make every reasonable effort to immediately notify the parents, legal guardian or legal custodian that such child has been taken into protective custody.

If the department determines, according to the criteria set forth in § 37-1-114, that the child should remain in protective custody longer than the next regular weekday session of the juvenile court, it shall petition the court for an order authorizing such custody in the same manner as if the child were placed in a shelter.

The department shall attempt to avoid the placement of a child in an institution whenever possible.

Acts 1973, ch. 81, § 1; 1975, ch. 3, § 1; T.C.A., § 37-1204; Acts 1987, ch. 145, § 8.

Cross-References. Protective custody of sexually abused children by hospitals or similar institutions, §37-1-608.

Rule Reference. Sections 37-1-401 — 37-1-411 are referred to in Rule 13 of the Rules of the Supreme Court of Tennessee.

37-1-405. Reference of reported cases to local director — Notice to judge.

All cases reported to the juvenile court judge or to state or local law enforcement officers shall be referred immediately to the local director of the county office of the department for investigation.

If the court or law enforcement officer finds that there are reasonable grounds to believe that the child is suffering from illness or injury or is in immediate danger from the child's surroundings and that the child's removal is necessary, appropriate protective action shall be taken under part 1 of this chapter.

The county office of the department or the office of the sheriff or the chief law enforcement official of the municipality where the child resides, upon receipt of a report of harm or sexual abuse, shall give notice of the report to the judge having juvenile jurisdiction where the child resides.

If the case appears to involve severe child abuse as defined in § 37-1-102, including child sexual abuse, the county director of the department shall immediately notify and consult with the district attorney general where the harm occurred, and the district attorney general may take such action as the district attorney general deems appropriate, including petitioning the court for removal of the child or termination of parental rights in accordance with part 1 of this chapter. Whenever there are multiple investigations, the department, the district attorney general, law enforcement, and, where applicable, the child protection team, shall coordinate their investigations to the maximum extent possible so that interviews with the victimized child shall be kept to an absolute minimum. Reference to the audio or videotape or tapes made by the child protection team or department should be utilized whenever possible to avoid additional questioning of the child.

If, before the investigation is complete, the county office of the department or the local district attorney general determines that immediate removal is necessary to protect the child or other children, or if the district attorney general determines that influence is being exerted on a child victim of sexual abuse to change the child victim's testimony, the department or the district attorney general may proceed under part 1 of this chapter.

Acts 1973, ch. 81, § 1; 1977, ch. 482, § 9; 1980, ch. 776, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 37-1205; Acts 1985, ch. 478, §§ 33, 41.

Cross-References. Termination of parental rights, §§36-1-113,37-1-147.

Rule Reference. Sections 37-1-401 — 37-1-411 are referred to in Rule 13 of the Rules of the Supreme Court of Tennessee.

37-1-406. Availability for receiving reports — Commencement of investigations — Examination and observation of child — Reports — Services provided — Investigators — Interpreter for child who is deaf or hard of hearing.

The department shall be capable of receiving and investigating reports of child abuse twenty-four (24) hours a day, seven (7) days a week. The county office shall make a thorough investigation promptly after receiving either an oral or written report of harm. All representatives of the child protective services agency shall, at the initial time of contact with the individual who is subject to a child abuse and neglect investigation, advise the individual of the complaints or allegations made against the individual consistent with laws protecting the rights of the informant. If it appears that the immediate safety or well being of a child is endangered, that the family may flee or the child will be unavailable, or that the facts otherwise warrant, the department shall commence an investigation immediately, regardless of the time of day or night. In the event the report involves child sexual abuse, the department shall follow the procedures outlined in subsection (b).

In cases involving child sexual abuse, the investigation shall be conducted by a child protective investigation team as defined in § 37-1-602 relative to child sexual abuse pursuant to the provisions of § 37-1-606. In the event an immediate investigation has been initiated, the department shall notify the child protection team as soon as possible and the team shall proceed with the investigation in accordance with the provisions of chapter 478 of the Public Acts of 1985. Other cases of child abuse may be investigated by the team in the discretion of each individual team.

All private schools, as defined by § 49-6-3001, church-related schools, as defined by § 49-50-801, and state, county and local agencies shall give the team access to records in their custody pertaining to the child and shall otherwise cooperate fully with the investigation.

The investigation shall include:

The nature, extent and cause of the harm, including a determination of whether there exists a threat of harm, and the nature and extent of any present or prior injuries or abuse;

The identity of the person responsible for it;

The nature and extent of any previous allegations, complaints, or petitions of abuse or dependency and neglect against the parent or person responsible for the care of the child;

The names and conditions of the other children in the home;

An evaluation of the parents or persons responsible for the care of the child, the home environment, and the relationship of each child to the parents or persons responsible for such child's care;

The identity of any other persons in the same household;

The identity of any other children in the care of any adult residing in the household; and

All other pertinent data.

The investigation shall include a visit to the child's home, an interview with and the physical observation of the child, an interview with and the physical observation of any other children in the child's home, and an interview with the parent or parents or other custodian of the child and any other persons in the child's home. If the investigator deems it necessary, the investigation shall also include medical, psychological or psychiatric examinations of the child and any other children in the child's home or under the care of any person alleged to have permitted or caused abuse, neglect or sexual abuse to the child. If the investigator determines, based on a visit to the child's home, observation of and interview with the subject child, and interview with other persons in the child's home, that the report of harm was wholly without substance, the investigator may determine that physical and psychological examinations of the subject child are unnecessary, in which case they will not be required. If admission to the home, school, or any place where the child may be, or permission of the parents or persons responsible for the child's care for the physical and psychological or psychiatric examinations cannot be obtained, the juvenile court, upon cause shown, shall order the parents or person responsible for the care of the child or the person in charge of any place where the child may be, to allow entrance for the interview, examination, and investigation. If the report of harm indicates that the abuse, neglect or sexual abuse occurred in a place other than the child's home, then, in the discretion of the investigator, the investigation may include a visit to the location where the incident occurred or a personal interview with the child and the parents or other custodians in another location instead of a visit to the child's home.

Any person required to investigate cases of child abuse may take or cause to be taken photographs of the areas of trauma visible on a child who is the subject of a report and of any objects or conditions in the child's home or surroundings that could have caused or contributed to the harm to the child. If the nature of the child's injuries indicate a need for immediate medical examination or treatment, the investigator may take or cause the child to be taken for diagnosis to a licensed physician or an emergency department in a hospital without the consent of the child's parents, legal guardian or legal custodian. Any licensed physician who, based on information furnished by the investigator, the parents or other persons having knowledge of the situation, or the child, or on personal observation of the child, suspects that an injury was the result of child abuse, may authorize appropriate examinations to be performed on the child without the consent of the child's parent, legal guardian or legal custodian.

At the initial investigation of child abuse and at any subsequent investigation as deemed appropriate by the investigator, audio or videotape recording may be taken of the traumatized victim. Such tape shall be admissible as evidence in cases of child sexual abuse if it meets the standards established in title 24 for the use of recorded statements. Regardless of whether such recording is used in evidence, it shall be made available for use as provided in § 37-1-405(b)(2).

The investigator shall interview the child outside the presence of the parent(s) or other persons allegedly responsible for the harm and, wherever possible, shall interview the child in a neutral setting other than the location where the alleged abuse occurred.

No later than sixty (60) days after receiving the initial report, the department or team in cases of child sexual abuse or the department in all other cases shall determine whether the reported abuse was indicated or unfounded and report its findings to the department's abuse registry. Each member of the team shall be provided with a copy of the report in any case investigated by the team. In any case investigated solely by the department, the department shall make a complete written investigation report, including its recommendation, to the juvenile court. The district attorney general shall also be provided a copy of any report in all cases where the investigation determines that the report was indicated. Further proceedings shall be conducted pursuant to part 1 of this chapter, as appropriate.

If the department or team in cases of child sexual abuse or the department in all other cases determines that the protection of the child so requires, the department shall provide or arrange for services necessary to prevent further abuse, to safeguard and enhance the welfare of children, and to preserve family life. Such services may include provision for protective shelter, to include room and board; medical and remedial care; day care; homemaker; caretaker; transportation; counseling and therapy; training courses for the parents or legal guardian; and arranging for the provision of other appropriate services. All such services shall be provided when appropriate within the limits of available resources. These services shall first be offered for the voluntary acceptance by the parent or other person responsible for the care of the child, unless immediate removal is needed to protect the child. At any point if the department or team in cases of child sexual abuse or the department in all other cases deems that the child's need for protection so requires, it may proceed with appropriate action under part 1 of this chapter.

If the investigator, as a result of the investigation, determines that there is cause to classify the report of severe abuse as indicated rather than unfounded, the team in cases of child sexual abuse or the department in all other cases may recommend that criminal charges be filed against the alleged offender. Any interested person who has information regarding the offenses may forward a statement to the district attorney general as to whether such person believes prosecution is justified and appropriate. Within fifteen (15) days of the completion of the district attorney general's investigation of a report of severe abuse, the district attorney general shall advise the department or team whether or not prosecution is justified and appropriate, in the district attorney general's opinion, in view of the circumstances of the specific case.

The legislative intent of this section is to protect the legal rights of the family in an investigation and to ensure that no activity occurs that compromises the department's child abuse investigation or any ongoing concurrent criminal investigation conducted by law enforcement.

In jurisdictions that have implemented the multi-level response system, in addition to other investigative procedures under this section, local law enforcement officers and district attorneys general having jurisdiction shall assist the department, on request in writing, if the department determines that it is likely that the case may result in criminal prosecution or that a child protective services worker may be at risk of harm while investigating the following reports of harm:

Any report of harm alleging facts that, if proved, would constitute severe child abuse as defined in § 37-1-102;

Any report of harm alleging facts that, if proved, would constitute child sexual abuse as defined in § 37-1-602;

Any report of harm alleging facts that, if proved, would constitute the following physical injuries to a child:

Head trauma;

Broken bones;

Inflicted burns;

Organic functional impairment, as defined by the department;

Broken skin;

Shaken baby syndrome;

Defensive injuries;

Injuries related to physical confinement; or

Infants exposed to illegal narcotics, including methamphetamine;

Any report of harm alleging facts that, if proved, would constitute the following types of neglect:

A child left without supervision in a dangerous environment;

Lack of food or nurturance resulting in a failure to thrive;

Abandonment of a child under the age of eight (8);

Lack of care that results in a life-threatening condition or hospitalization; or

Inaction of the parent resulting in serious physical injury;

Any report of harm alleging facts that would result in the removal of a child from the home pursuant to department policy or rule;

Any report of harm alleging facts that involve a caretaker at any institution, including, but not limited to, any licensed day care center, public or private school, or hospital; or

Any report of harm alleging facts that, if proved, would constitute any other class of injury identified by the department through policy or rule as necessitating investigation.

If a local law enforcement agency or district attorney general assisting the department under this subsection (m) decides not to proceed with prosecution or terminates prosecution after undertaking it, the agency or district attorney general shall make a written report on a standardized check-off form developed by the department and the Tennessee district attorneys general conference to the department and the juvenile court on the basis for its decision. The department shall compile such reports and present them to the judiciary committee of the senate and the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over children and families as part of its report pursuant to the multi-level response system for children and families, compiled in chapter 5, part 6 of this title. The department shall make quarterly reports to local law enforcement agencies and district attorneys general as to the number and types of cases the department is handling in their jurisdictions on the basis of reports of harm or sexual abuse or of children at risk of being so harmed or sexually abused.

If the report of child abuse alleges physical abuse, it shall be in the best interest of the child that the child be referred to a child advocacy center or that the investigation be conducted by a child protective services investigator who is adequately trained in investigating physical abuse reports. Under no circumstances shall the investigation be performed by a probation officer previously assigned to the child.

Any investigator or law enforcement officer who is investigating a possible domestic abuse or child abuse incident that may have involved or occurred in the presence of a child who is deaf or hard of hearing shall not use the child's parent or family member as an interpreter. The investigator or officer shall instead communicate with the child who is deaf or hard of hearing using an interpreter trained as a sign language interpreter.

The interpreter may interpret from a remote location by communicating with the child using video remote interpreting. If the child is unable to understand, then a live, qualified interpreter from the list identified in subdivision (o)(3) shall be used. The communication shall occur outside the presence of the child's parent, other family members, or potential abusers.

Law enforcement agencies shall maintain a list of interpreters developed from a list provided by the Tennessee council for the deaf, deaf-blind, and hard of hearing.

Acts 1985, ch. 478, § 41; 1987, ch. 145, §§ 6, 7, 18, 19, 21, 31; 1988, ch. 964, § 2; 2004, ch. 740, §§ 2, 3; 2005, ch. 391, § 10; 2009, ch. 336, § 1; 2011, ch. 410, § 3(e); 2012, ch. 888, § 1; 2013, ch. 236, § 21; 2015, ch. 231, § 1; 2019, ch. 329, § 1; 2019, ch. 345, § 35; 2019, ch. 510, § 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. For codification of Acts 1985, ch. 478, see Session Law Disposition Tables in Volume 13.

For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment added (o).

The 2019 amendment by ch. 329 substituted “child who is deaf or hard of hearing” for “hearing-impaired child” twice in (o)(1).

The 2019 amendment ch. 345 substituted “the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over children and families” for “the civil justice committee of the house of representatives” in (m)(2).

The 2019 amendment by. ch. 510 added (d)(3); and in (e), inserted “the” preceding “physical”, and inserted “, an interview with and the physical observation of any other children in the child's home” following “the child”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 231, § 2. April 21, 2015.

Acts 2019, ch. 329, § 9. May 8, 2019.

Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

Acts 2019, ch. 510, § 7. June 3, 2019.

Cross-References. Child sexual abuse, title 37, ch. 1, part 6.

Examination of sexually abused children, §37-1-609.

Rule Reference. Sections 37-1-401 — 37-1-411 are referred to in Rule 13 of the Rules of the Supreme Court of Tennessee.

Law Reviews.

Better Protection for the Defenseless — Tennessee's Revised Mandatory Child Abuse Reporting Statute, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 585 (1973).

Attorney General Opinions. DCS authority to reverse child protection team determination of sexual abuse. OAG 10-101, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 103 (10/1/10).

37-1-407. Guidelines for child safety training programs.

By January 1, 2019, the department shall develop instructional guidelines for child safety training programs for members of professions that frequently deal with children who may be at risk of abuse, which programs include the common signs of child abuse, human trafficking when a child is the victim, and child sexual abuse; how to identify children at risk of abuse, human trafficking, or sexual abuse; and the reporting requirements of this part. The department shall work with each licensing board to ensure that any child safety training program created by a licensing board fully and accurately reflects the best practices for identifying and reporting child abuse, human trafficking when a child is the victim, and child sexual abuse as appropriate for each profession.

Acts 2018, ch. 964, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §37-1-407 (Acts 1977, ch. 343, § 4; 1978, ch. 886, § 3; T.C.A., § 37-1207; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 73), concerning child abuse review teams, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 238, § 1, effective May 20, 2009.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 964, § 2. May 15, 2018.